Idaho, session 2025, H0208.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-1413, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-1413. CONSOLIDATION OF DISTRICTS -- HEARING -- PROTEST -- ELEC-
TION. Except as provided for in section 31-1423(2)(b), Idaho Code, any Any
fire protection district may consolidate with one (1) or more existing fire
protection districts subject to the following procedure, or pursuant to an
election for consolidation as provided in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, and
with the following effects:
(1) If, in the opinion of the board of any fire protection district, it
would be to the advantage of said district to consolidate with one (1) or more
other existing fire protection districts, the said board shall cause to be
prepared an agreement for consolidation which that shall among other things
provide:
(a) The name of the proposed consolidated fire protection district.;
(b) That all property of the districts to be consolidated shall become
the property of the consolidated district.;
(c) That all debts of the districts to be consolidated shall become the
debts of the consolidated district.;
(d) That the existing commissioners of the districts to be consolidated
shall be the commissioners of the consolidated district until the next
election, said election to be held pursuant to the terms provisions of
section 31-1410, Idaho Code, at which three (3) commissioners shall be
elected, unless the agreement of consolidation establishes a five (5)
member board, in which case five (5) commissioners shall be elected.
If the board consists of three (3) members, commissioners from fire
protection subdistricts one and two shall be elected for terms of four
(4) years, and the commissioner from fire protection subdistrict three
shall be elected for a term of two (2) years. If the board consists of
five (5) commissioners, the commissioners from fire protection subdis-
tricts one, three and five shall be elected for terms of four (4) years,
and the commissioners from fire protection subdistricts two and four


shall be elected for an initial term of two (2) years. Thereafter, the
term of all commissioners shall be four (4) years.; and
(e) That the employees of the consolidated fire protection district
shall be selected from the employees of the fire protection districts
being consolidated, which employees shall retain the seniority rights
under their existing employment contracts.
(2) After approval of the agreement of consolidation by each of the
fire protection district boards involved, the boards of commissioners of
each fire protection district shall hold a hearing not less than ten (10) or
more than thirty (30) days thereafter and shall cause notice of the hearing,
designating the time and place to be published in at least one (1) issue of a
newspaper of general circulation within the district not less than five (5)
days prior to the hearing. Any person supporting or objecting to the peti-
tion shall be heard at the hearing, if in attendance, and at the close of the
hearing the board shall approve or reject the agreement of consolidation.
If each board approves the agreement of consolidation, the agreement shall
become effective and the consolidation of the district complete thirty (30)
days after the approval unless within the thirty (30) days a petition signed
by twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified electors of one (1) of the fire
protection districts objecting to the consolidation be filed with the secre-
tary of the district. In the event of an objection, an election shall be held
as provided in section 31-1405, Idaho Code, except that the question shall
be "consolidation of.... fire protection district, yes," or "consolidation
of.... fire protection district, no," or words equivalent thereto. If more
than one-half (1/2) of the votes cast are yes, the agreement shall become ef-
fective. If more than one-half (1/2) of the votes cast are no, the agreement
shall be void and of no effect; and no new consolidation shall be proposed for
at least six (6) months following the date of the consolidation election.
(3) Upon the agreement of consolidation becoming effective, the board
of the consolidated fire protection district shall file a certified copy
of the agreement with the county recorder of each county in which such dis-
trict is situated and shall comply with the provisions of section 63-215,
Idaho Code. The consolidated district shall thereafter have the same rights
and obligations as any other fire protection district organized under the
statutes of this state.
(4) An agreement of consolidation shall not take effect unless the pro-
visions of section 31-1423(2)(b), Idaho Code, are complied with.
SECTION 2. That Section 31-1423, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-1423. LEVY -- RECOMMENDED LEVY -- ELECTION. (1) Each year, immedi-
ately prior to the annual county levy of taxes, the board of commissioners
of each fire protection district, organized and existing under this chapter,
may levy a tax upon all the taxable property within the boundaries of such
district sufficient to defray the cost of equipping and maintaining the dis-
trict of twenty-four hundredths percent (.24%) of market value for assess-
ment purposes, to be used for the purposes of this chapter and for no other
purpose. The levy shall be made by resolution entered upon the minutes of the
board of commissioners of the fire protection district, and it shall be the
duty of the secretary of the district, immediately after entry of the resolu-


tion in the minutes, to transmit to the county auditor and the county asses-
sor certified copies of the resolution providing for such levy. Said taxes
shall be collected as provided by section 63-812, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) If two (2) or more fire protection districts consolidate into
one (1) district, the provisions of section 63-802, Idaho Code, shall ap-
ply to the consolidated district's budget request as if the former district
which, in the year of the consolidation, has the higher levy subject to the
limitations of section 63-802, Idaho Code, had annexed the other district or
districts. In addition, the consolidated district shall receive the bene-
fit of foregone increases accumulated by the former districts under section
63-802(1)(a), Idaho Code.
(b) Provided however, that if the higher levy rate provided for in
subsection (2)(a) of this section exceeds the lowest levy rate of any
of the districts to be consolidated by more than three percent (3%),
the commissioners of the districts consolidating shall recommend, by
a majority of the commissioners of each district involved, at a public
hearing where a quorum of each district board is present, a levy rate
that falls between the highest levy rate and the lowest levy rate. In
determining such recommended levy rate, the commissioners shall recom-
mend a levy rate that shall be sufficient to defray the cost of equipping
and maintaining the new consolidated district. If such recommended
levy rate exceeds by more than three percent (3%) the lowest current
district levy rate of any of the districts to be consolidated, an elec-
tion shall be held in a manner consistent with the provisions of section
31-1414, Idaho Code. In such election, the electors residing in the
fire protection districts seeking to consolidate shall vote to approve
or disapprove the recommended levy rate and the proposed consolidation
of districts. The question put to the electors shall be the same or sim-
ilar to the question provided for in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, except
that the question shall include, in addition to the language described
in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, a reference to the recommended levy rate
provided for in this section and a reference to the percentage change
of such recommended levy rate from the levy rate in existence in each
district in the immediately preceding year.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-215. LEGAL DESCRIPTION AND MAP OF BOUNDARIES TO BE RECORDED AND
FILED. (1) Any taxing district which that shall be formed or organized here-
after, or which that shall change any existing boundaries hereafter, shall
cause one (1) copy of the legal description and map prepared in a draftsman-
like manner which that shall plainly and clearly designate the boundaries
of such district or municipality as formed or organized, or as altered,
to be recorded with the county recorder and filed with the county assessor
in the counties within which the unit is located, any taxing district with
taxing authority that will be affected by the formation or change in exist-
ing boundaries of such taxing district, and with the state tax commission
within thirty (30) days following the effective date of such formation,
organization or alteration but no later than the tenth day of January of
the year following such formation, organization or alteration. In the case


of fire protection districts, the board of county commissioners approving
the boundaries shall be responsible for delivering to the assessor, and
recorder, and any affected fire protection districts the map and legal de-
scription of the amended district boundaries. Formation, organization or
alteration documents that are filed pursuant to this section shall include
contact information that is current at the time of filing and that identifies
an individual associated with the taxing district.
(2) Urban renewal agencies shall comply with the requirements of sub-
section (1) of this section when a revenue allocation area within the juris-
diction of the urban renewal agency is formed or when the boundaries of such
an area are altered.
(3) The state tax commission shall review filings required by subsec-
tions (1) and (2) of this section and, if the commission finds that the for-
mation of a district or a change in a district's boundaries fails to provide
a proper legal description or fails to correctly identify the boundaries,
the state tax commission shall notify the affected taxing authority within
twenty-eight (28) days after receiving the original request. The notifica-
tion shall list any errors or omissions in the submitted map and legal de-
scription along with any possible remedies to correct said errors or omis-
sions. The taxing authority shall be provided an additional twenty-eight
(28) days after receiving the requested change from the state tax commis-
sion to provide a corrected map and legal description. If the corrected map
and legal description fail to correctly identify the boundaries or change
of boundaries of the taxing district, as was listed in the state tax commis-
sion's notification, then the state tax commission may direct that the for-
mation or change not be recognized for property tax purposes. The state tax
commission's review shall not include matters relating to notice, open meet-
ings law requirements, or compliance with provisions in Idaho law not relat-
ing to boundaries.
(4) The county assessor, county auditor and state tax commission shall
retain on file in their respective offices all copies of legal descriptions
of taxing district boundaries and maps filed by the various taxing jurisdic-
tions authorized to impose a levy on property.
(5) The state tax commission shall be responsible for providing copies
of uniform tax code area numbers and maps to the county assessor, county au-
ditor and county treasurer and various companies having operating property
subject to assessment in the state of Idaho and under the jurisdiction of the
state tax commission for assessment and taxation purposes.
(6) Unless otherwise specifically authorized to form with noncontigu-
ous boundaries, or to annex or deannex properties so as to make noncontigu-
ous boundaries, all taxing districts shall form with and maintain contiguous
boundaries.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.